Utah statutes.
73-18c-103.   Liability not limited to face amount of owner's security.
(1)  If a person maintains owner's security under this chapter, it does not
limit the person's liability to the face amount of the owner's security.
(2)  Nothing in this chapter prevents the plaintiff in any action at law from
relying for relief upon other processes provided by law.
